src/fst/morphology/affixes/adjectives.lexc
LEXICON MES
           +Der1+Der/Superl+A:%>%^COMPDISIMPmes%^DISIMP ATTRCONT ;
    +Der1+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom:%>%^COMPDISIMPmes%^DISIMP FINAL1   ;
    +Der1+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Acc:masse%>m                  FINAL1   ;
    +Der1+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Gen:masse%>n                  FINAL1   ;
    +Der1+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Ill:masse%>se                 FINAL1   ;
    +Der1+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Ine:masse%>sne                FINAL1   ;
    +Der1+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Ela:masse%>ste                FINAL1   ;
    +Der1+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Com:mass%>ine                 FINAL1   ;

    +Der1+Der/Superl+A+Pl+Nom:%>mass%>h                 FINAL1   ;

    +Der1+Der/Superl+A+Pl+Acc:%>mass%>ide               FINAL1   ;
    +Der1+Der/Superl+A+Pl+Gen:%>mass%>i                 FINAL1   ;
    +Der1+Der/Superl+A+Pl+Ill:%>mass%>ide               FINAL1   ;
    +Der1+Der/Superl+A+Pl+Ine:%>mass%>ine               FINAL1   ;
    +Der1+Der/Superl+A+Pl+Ela:%>mass%>ijste             FINAL1   ;
    +Der1+Der/Superl+A+Pl+Com:%>mass%>igujmie           FINAL1   ;
           +Der1+Der/Superl+A:mass                      EVEN_ESS ;
 +Der1+Der/Superl+A+Cmp/SgNom:%>%^COMPDISIMPmes%^DISIMP R        ;
 +Der1+Der/Superl+A+Cmp/SgGen:masse%>n                  R        ;
 +Der1+Der/Superl+A+Cmp/PlGen:mass%>i                   R        ;

 +Der1+Der/Superl+A+Der2+Der/Dimin+A+Sg+Nom:tjommes                    FINAL1        ;
 +Der1+Der/Superl+A+Der2+Der/Dimin+A+Sg+Nom:tjammes                    FINAL1        ;
 +Der1+Der/Superl+A+Der2+Der/Dimin+A+Sg+Nom:tjommese                   FINAL1        ;
 +Der1+Der/Superl+A+Der2+Der/Dimin+A+Sg+Nom:tjammese                   FINAL1        ;

    +Der1+Der/Superl+A+Der2+Der/Dimin+A+Sg+Acc:%>tjommese%>m                     FINAL1   ;
    +Der1+Der/Superl+A+Der2+Der/Dimin+A+Sg+Gen:%>tjommese%>n                     FINAL1   ;
    +Der1+Der/Superl+A+Der2+Der/Dimin+A+Sg+Ela:%>%^COMPDISIMPtjommese%>ste       FINAL1   ;
    +Der1+Der/Superl+A+Der2+Der/Dimin+A+Sg+Ill:%>%^COMPDISIMPtjommesa%>sse       FINAL1   ;
    +Der1+Der/Superl+A+Der2+Der/Dimin+A+Sg+Ine:%>%^COMPDISIMPtjommesi%>snie      FINAL1   ;
    +Der1+Der/Superl+A+Der2+Der/Dimin+A+Sg+Com:%>%^COMPDISIMPtjommes%>ine        FINAL1   ;
    +Der1+Der/Superl+A+Der2+Der/Dimin+A+Sg+Ill:%>%^COMPDISIMPtjommese%>se        FINAL1   ;

    +Der1+Der/Superl+A+Der2+Der/Dimin+A+Sg+Ine:%>%^COMPDISIMPtjommese%>sne  FINAL1   ;
    +Der1+Der/Superl+A+Der2+Der/Dimin+A+Sg+Ela:%>%^COMPDISIMPtjommese%>ste  FINAL1   ;
    +Der1+Der/Superl+A+Der2+Der/Dimin+A+Sg+Com:%>%^COMPDISIMPtjommes%>ine   FINAL1   ;
    +Der1+Der/Superl+A+Der2+Der/Dimin+A+Pl+Nom:%>tjommes%>h                  FINAL1   ;
    +Der1+Der/Superl+A+Der2+Der/Dimin+A+Pl+Nom:%>tjommes%>eh                 FINAL1   ;
    +Der1+Der/Superl+A+Der2+Der/Dimin+A+Pl+Acc:%>%^COMPDISIMPtjommes%>ide    FINAL1   ;
    +Der1+Der/Superl+A+Der2+Der/Dimin+A+Pl+Acc:%>%^COMPDISIMPtjommes%>ide   FINAL1   ;
    +Der1+Der/Superl+A+Der2+Der/Dimin+A+Pl+Gen:%>tjommes%>                   IGENSUFF ;
    +Der1+Der/Superl+A+Der2+Der/Dimin+A+Pl+Ill:%>%^COMPDISIMPtjommes%>ide    FINAL1   ;
    +Der1+Der/Superl+A+Der2+Der/Dimin+A+Pl+Ine:%>%^COMPDISIMPtjommes%>ine    FINAL1   ;
    +Der1+Der/Superl+A+Der2+Der/Dimin+A+Pl+Ela:%>%^COMPDISIMPtjommes%>ijste  FINAL1   ;
    +Der1+Der/Superl+A+Der2+Der/Dimin+A+Pl+Ill:%>%^COMPDISIMPtjommes%>ide   FINAL1   ;
    +Der1+Der/Superl+A+Der2+Der/Dimin+A+Pl+Ine:%>%^COMPDISIMPtjommes%>ine   FINAL1   ;
    +Der1+Der/Superl+A+Der2+Der/Dimin+A+Pl+Ela:%>%^COMPDISIMPtjommes%>ijste FINAL1   ;
    +Der1+Der/Superl+A+Der2+Der/Dimin+A+Pl+Com:%>tjommes%>igujmie            FINAL1   ;
       +Der1+Der/Superl+A+Der2+Der/Dimin+A+Ess:%>%^COMPDISIMPtjommes%>ine    FINAL1   ;
       +Der1+Der/Superl+A+Der2+Der/Dimin+A+Ess:%>%^COMPDISIMPtjommes%>ine   FINAL1   ;


LEXICON A_LDH
    ATTRCONT ;
 +Sg+Nom: FINAL1   ;
  +Sg+Pl: FINAL1   ;

LEXICON IJLE_LOAN_A
:ijl e_E_EVEN ;!!= @CODE@
+Use/NG:ïjl e_E_EVEN ;
 +Err/Orth:il  e_E_EVEN ;

!AdverbLexicons
LEXICON LAAKAN
         +Der1+Der/laakan:#laakan adv ;
+Der1+Der/laakan+Err/Orth:-laakan adv ;
         +Der1+Der/laaketje+A+Attr:#laaketje  FINAL1 ;
+Der1+Der/laaketje+A+Attr+Err/Orth:-laaketje FINAL1 ;
         +Der1+Der/laaketje+A+Sg+Nom:#laaketje FINAL1 ;
+Der1+Der/laaketje+A+Sg+Nom+Err/Orth:-laaketje FINAL1 ;

LEXICON LEEJNES
         :#leejnes ATTR_0 ;
  +Use/NG:#leejns  ATTR_0 ;
 +Err/Orth:-leejnes ATTR_0 ;
 +Err/Orth:-leejns  ATTR_0 ;
          :#leejne PRED_0 ;
 +Err/Orth:#leejnes PRED_0 ; !
 +Err/Orth:#leejns  PRED_0 ;

LEXICON A-TODO
+TODO:0 # ;
