src/fst/morphology/stems/adjectives.lexc
LEXICON Adjective
aktengïeleh+A+Err/Orth:akten#gïeleldh A_LDH ; !samediggediedahus 2012
aktetjeleejnes+A:aktetje LEEJNES ;
barkije+A:barkije A-TODO ;
byjrehke+A:byjrehke A-TODO ;
daaroengïeleh+A+Err/Orth:daaroen#gïeleldh A_LDH ; !samediggediedahus 2012! skal kanskje bare ha attr. - man sier" dïhte guektiengïelesne" med innesiv
faagegïeleh+A+Err/Orth:faage#gïeleldh A_LDH ; !samediggediedahus 2012
febrïjle+A+OLang/NOB:febr IJLE_LOAN_A ;
gaektsiengïeleh+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:gaektsien#gïeleldh A_LDH ; !OBS
gamkehts+A:gamkehts A-TODO ;
gaskemes+A:gaske MES ; !superl
geekteleejnes+A:geekte LEEJNES ;
gelliengïeleh+A+Err/Orth:gellien#gïeleldh A_LDH ; !samediggediedahus 2012
golmengïeleh+A+Err/Orth:golmen#gïeleldh A_LDH ; !samediggediedahus 2012
golmengïeleh+A+Err/Orth:guelmien#gïeleldh A_LDH ; !samediggediedahus 2012
govhtengïeleh+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:govhten#gïeleldh A_LDH ;
guektieleejnes+A:guektie LEEJNES ;
guektiengïeleh+A+Err/Orth:guektien#gïeleldh A_LDH ; !samediggediedahus 2012
guektiengïeleh+A+Err/Orth:guekten#gïeleldh A_LDH ; !samediggediedahus 2012
guektiengïeleh+A+Err/Orth:göökten#gïeleldh A_LDH ; 
gïeleh+A+Err/Orth:gïeleldh A_LDH ; !samediggediedahus 2012
habijle+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:hab IJLE_LOAN_A ;
homofijle+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+OLang/NOB:homof IJLE_LOAN_A ;
inhabijle+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+OLang/NOB:inhab IJLE_LOAN_A ;
instabijle+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+OLang/NOB:in^stab IJLE_LOAN_A ;
jabjemes+A:jabjemes A-TODO ;
jamhkoes+A:jamhkoes A-TODO ;
jeatjahleejnes+A:jeatjah LEEJNES ;
jovje-rööpses+A:jovje-rööpses A-TODO ;
jïjtje-raarehke+A:jïjtje-raarehke A-TODO ;
labïjle+A:lab IJLE_LOAN_A ;
meadtohks+A:meadtohks A-TODO ;
merkantijle+A+OLang/NOB:merkant IJLE_LOAN_A ;
mobijle+A+OLang/NOB:mob IJLE_LOAN_A ;
måedtieleejnes+A:måedtie LEEJNES ;
njieljien-joelkege+A:njieljien-joelkege A-TODO ;
njieljien-raadtege+A:njieljien-raadtege A-TODO ;
njïeljengïeleh+A+Err/Orth+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:njïeljen#gïeleldh A_LDH ;
nåavedeleejnes+A:nåavede LEEJNES ;
presenïjle+A+OLang/NOB:presen IJLE_LOAN_A ;
puerijle+A+OLang/NOB:pu^er IJLE_LOAN_A ;
saemiengïeleh+A+Err/Orth:saemien#gïeleldh A_LDH ; !samediggediedahus 2012
saemiengïeleh+A+Err/Orth:saemien#gïelelh A_LDH ; !
seammaleejnes+A:seamma LEEJNES ; !
senijle+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+OLang/NOB:sen IJLE_LOAN_A ;
servijle+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+OLang/NOB:serv IJLE_LOAN_A ;
sivijle+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+OLang/NOB:siv IJLE_LOAN_A ;
stabijle+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:stab IJLE_LOAN_A ;
sterijle+A+OLang/NOB:ster IJLE_LOAN_A ;
subtijle+A+OLang/NOB:subt IJLE_LOAN_A ;
suomengïeleh+A+Err/Orth:suomen#gïeleldh A_LDH ; !samediggediedahus 2012! skal kanskje bare ha attr. - man sier" dïhte guektiengïelesne" med innesiv A.Jacobsen+ "såevmiengïele nyjsene"
svïenskegïeleh+A+Err/Orth:svïenske#gïeleldh A_LDH ; !samediggediedahus 2012! skal kanskje bare ha attr. - man sier" dïhte guektiengïelesne" med innesiv
tjïjhtjengïeleh+A+Err/Orth+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:tjïjhtjen#gïeleldh A_LDH ;
uktsiengïeleh+A+Err/Orth+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:uktsien#gïeleldh A_LDH ; ! osv..+-)
virijle+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+OLang/NOB:vir IJLE_LOAN_A ;
vïjhtengïeleh+A+Err/Orth+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:vïjhten#gïeleldh A_LDH ;
åarjelsaemiengïeleh+A+Err/Orth:åarjelsaemien#gïeleldh A_LDH ;
bifijle+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+OLang/NOB:bif IJLE_LOAN_A ;
voestesgïeleh+A+Err/Orth:voestes#gïeleldh A_LDH ;
